Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.232

Transition to two payrolls per month—Guidelines on deductions and deferrals.

In order to facilitate the transition from one payroll per month to two payrolls per month, the following guidelines concerning payroll deductions and deferrals are established:

(1) All mandatory and voluntary deductions which are based upon a percentage of salary shall be deducted, after August 23, 1983, from the salaries payable for each pay period. This subsection shall apply regardless of when the deductions were authorized or required.

(2) The office of financial management shall adopt reasonable procedures providing for deductions, including deferrals, which are not based on a percentage of salary.

(3) Amounts which are deducted in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be paid to the designated recipient no later than the established paydates except when other agreements are reached with the designated recipient.

(4) Payment of deductions and deferrals to the designated recipient shall be made by warrant or check except when the designated recipient requests payment by electronic funds transfer. If recipients request electronic funds transfers, sufficient time shall be made available to establish the process. The elapsed time to establish the process shall not exceed three months from the time the recipient has requested in writing to the appropriate data processing payroll systems manager to receive payment by electronic funds transfer.

Documentation and itemization of deductions or deferrals paid shall be in printed form unless the designated recipient requests computer tapes. If recipients request computer tapes, sufficient time shall be made available to establish the process. Computer tapes shall be made available to the requesting designated recipient if at least one hundred employees paid from an automated payroll system have such deductions. The elapsed time to establish the process for providing computer tapes shall not exceed three months from the time the recipient has requested in writing to the appropriate data processing payroll systems manager to receive computer tapes. With the approval of the office of financial management, more advanced technology may be utilized to provide payment, documentation, and itemization of deductions to designated recipients.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 28 s 4.]

NOTES:

Application—1983 1st ex.s. c 28: See note following RCW 42.16.010.